Utah statutes.
17-16a-5.   Compensation for assistance in transaction involving county -- Public disclosure and filing required.

(1)  No elected or appointed officer may receive or agree to receive compensation for assisting any person or business entity in any transaction involving the county in which he is an officer unless he files with the county legislative body a sworn statement giving the information required by this section, and discloses in open meeting to the members of the body of which he is a member, immediately prior to the discussion, the information required by Subsection (3).

(2)  The statement required to be filed by this section shall be filed 10 days prior to the date of any agreement between the elected or appointed officer and the person or business entity being assisted or 10 days prior to the receipt of compensation by the business entity. The statement is public information and is available for examination by the public.

(3)  The statement and disclosure shall contain the following information:

(a)  the name and address of the officer;

(b)  the name and address of the person or business entity being or to be assisted, or in which the appointed or elected official has a substantial interest; and

(c)  a brief description of the transaction as to which service is rendered or is to be rendered and of the nature of the service performed or to be performed.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

